src/fst/morphology/phonology.nounadj.xfscript
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! seol
! naomh, craobh, gaol, saol, fraoch
! ball, leabhar
! bruscar, bac but not balla
! bád, sleán, Seán 
! cnoc, post, tonn, bocht, 
! fód, glór
! punt, cúr, casúr, bruas
! oil(e)án, cin(e)ál, s(e)án
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X (e) [%^AO|a|á|o|ó|u|ú|%^UA] _ Cons+ %^Caol 			 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! náis(i)ún, proifisiúin
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X (i) ú _ Cons+ %^Caol 			 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! íol, bíol, síol, buíon, suíomh
! fionn 
! eachaíos - eachaís, soilíos - soilís
.o.
 o -> [%^FS ] || %^X (a|u) [i|í] _ Cons+ %^Caol 		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! fliuch - fliche
.o.
 u -> [%^FS ] || %^X  [i|í] _ Cons+ %^Caol 		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! grian->gréine, pian->péine, 
! sliabh->sléibhte, 
! (h)iall->(h)éille
! liach - léiche
! cliabh needs fixing
.o.
 i a -> %^FS é i || %^X (h) _ Cons+ %^Caol (t) e		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! rian->riain
.o.
 [..] -> %^FS i || %^X i a _ Cons+ %^Caol .#.		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! scian->sceana
.o.
i a -> %^FS e a || %^X _ Cons+ %^Caol a 		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.
 %^Caol -> []		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
! ;

!! May 1998
!! Leathú (^Lea) :Broadening of slender words
!! Usually by removing "i"
!! but also by substituting vowels eg io->ea
!! and also by inserting a broad vowel eg í->ío
!!
!! included %^FH in i -> ea rule
!**************************************************************************

.o.
 o i  -> %^FB a || r _ Cons+ %^Lea	!!≈ - @CODE@  roinn -> rann 

.o.
 i -> %^FB a || [e|é] _ Cons+ %^Lea	!!≈ - @CODE@  greim(m) -> greama, spéir -> spéartha

.o. 
 i -> %^FB e a || [b|c|m|r] (%^FH h) %^X _ Cons+ %^Lea 			 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
				!!≈ - @CODE@  binn -> beanna, rith -> reatha
				!!≈ - @CODE@  cith(m) -> ceatha, crith(m) -> creatha
				!!≈ - @CODE@  scian -> sceana (I) imirt -> imeartha

 
.o.
 i -> [%^FB] || [a|á|%^AE|o|ó|ú|%^UA|%^AO] _ Cons+ %^Lea		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
				!!≈ - @CODE@  CHECK WHETHER "u" SHOULD BE HERE TOO???
				!!≈ - @CODE@  OR DOES "ui" ALWAYS GO TO "o" (see next rule)
				!!≈ - @CODE@  it appears so ...
				!!≈ - @CODE@  súil - súl, dúil, glúin
				!!≈ - @CODE@  cóir - córa, móin - móna
				!!≈ - @CODE@  deoir - deora, feoil - feola
				!!≈ - @CODE@  troid - troda, cainteoir - cainteora
				!!≈ - @CODE@  droim(m) - droma, goin - gona, toil
				!!≈ - @CODE@  gáir - gártha, tiomáint - tiomána
				!!≈ - @CODE@  síocháin - síochána, cáisc - cásca
				!!≈ - @CODE@  stair - startha, flaith(m) - flatha
				!!≈ - @CODE@  bliain - bliana
				!!≈ - @CODE@  grósaeir - grósaera (E), traein - traen(E)
				!!≈ - @CODE@  bádóir - bádóra, buairt(U) -> buartha
				!!≈ - @CODE@  aoir - aortha (O)

.o.
 u i -> %^FB o || _ Cons+ %^Lea	!!≈ - @CODE@  cuid -  na coda, fuil - fola

.o.
 [..] -> %^FB o || (a) í _ Cons+ %^Lea 			 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
				!!≈ - @CODE@  feadaíl - feadaíola, tír - tíortha
.o.
%^Lea -> []		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
! ;

!
!! Vowel Harmony of Broad and Slender Vowels: 
!!	Broad (back) - labio-velarised ; sounds like w-glide after vowel
!!	Slender (forward) - palatalised ; sounds like y-glide after vowel
!! Endings (which are appended to the root) must be broad or slender to agree with root 
!!
!! NB: this must be tested after ^Coim, ^Caol or ^Lea tags have been applied
!!
!! Examples 
!! - (1) (e)acha	: neadacha (nests), stoirmeacha (storms)
!! - (2) (e)anna	: carranna (cars),  áiteanna (places)
!!
!!  The broad ending "acha" or "anna" will be applied as standard. If the root
!!  is now found to be slender an "e" will be inserted
!
!***************************************************************************!
.o.
%^X -> []			!!≈ - @CODE@  no longer required and it would 
					!!≈ - @CODE@  get in the way of the next rule

.o.
! ^VH marker is replaced by "e" if final syllable is slender
[ %^VH -> e || [i|í] Cons* _ ]		!!≈ - @CODE@  check if the last vowel before the %^VH
					!!≈ - @CODE@  is slender (ie an "i" or "í" )
.o.
[ a -> [] || a %^VH _ ]		!!≈ - @CODE@  remove extre "a" in  Havana^VHach

.o.
 %^VH -> [] 		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

.o.
[..] -> e || [e|é|i|í|%^AE] Cons* s _ %^Emph		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

.o.
[..] -> a || [a|á|o|ó|u|ú|%^UA|%^IA|%^AO] Cons* s _ %^Emph		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

.o.
[..] -> %- ||  s _ s (a|e) %^Emph		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

.o.
%^Emph -> []		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 

! May 2001
! Last Part - tidy up

.o.
[ %^AE -> a e]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
![ %^IA -> i a]
!.o.
[ %^AO -> a o]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[ %^UA -> u a]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^F -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^M -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^N -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^G -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^V -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
.o.
[%^CB -> []]		 !!≈ - @CODE@ 
 ;
